Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB726.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6866YC (2) 91 ak/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 7.19 Regulation of religious 1 institutions and practices ââ limitation. 2 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the 3 governor shall not dictate a measure in a proclamation of a 4 state of disaster emergency issued pursuant to section 29C.6 5 that unduly interferes with the operations of a religious 6 institution or otherwise impedes an individualâs practice 7 of religion. For purposes of this section, a âreligious 8 institutionâ means a building in which individuals engage in 9 religious practices. 10 Sec. 2. Section 29C.6, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 11 to read as follows: 12 1. a. After finding a disaster exists or is threatened, 13 proclaim a state of disaster emergency. This proclamation 14 shall be in writing, indicate the area affected and the facts 15 upon which it is based, be signed by the governor, and be 16 filed with the secretary of state. If the state of disaster 17 emergency specifically constitutes a public health disaster 18 as defined in section 135.140 , the written proclamation shall 19 include a statement to that effect. A state of disaster 20 emergency shall continue for thirty fifteen days, unless sooner 21 terminated or rescinded, extended , or amended in writing by 22 the governor general assembly . The general assembly may, 23 by concurrent resolution, rescind , extend, or amend this 24 proclamation. An initial extension of this proclamation by 25 the general assembly shall not exceed fifteen days, and any 26 subsequent extension shall not exceed fifteen-day increments. 27 If the general assembly is not in session, the legislative 28 council may, by majority vote, rescind , extend, or amend this 29 proclamation only once and the extension shall not exceed 30 fifteen days . Rescission Following any rescission, extension, 31 or amendment of this proclamation by the legislative council, 32 only the general assembly may take any additional action. Any 33 rescission, extension, or amendment shall be effective upon 34 filing of the concurrent resolution of the general assembly or 35 -1- LSB 6866YC (2) 91 ak/ko 1/ 8 H.F. _____ resolution of the legislative council with the secretary of 1 state. A proclamation of disaster emergency shall activate the 2 disaster response and recovery aspect of the state, local, and 3 interjurisdictional disaster emergency plans applicable to the 4 political subdivision or area in question and be authority for 5 the deployment and use of any forces to which the each disaster 6 emergency plan applies, and for use or distribution of any 7 supplies, equipment, and materials and facilities assembled, 8 stockpiled, or arranged to be made available. 9 b. A measure dictated in a state of disaster emergency 10 proclamation shall not do any of the following: 11 (1) Infringe on a fundamental constitutionally protected 12 right unless the measure is justified by a compelling state 13 interest, is narrowly tailored to achieve its specific purpose, 14 and is achieved by the least restrictive means possible. 15 (2) Restrict rights, interests, or activities in a manner 16 that is not neutral or generally applicable. 17 (3) Prohibit in-person interactions between religious 18 leaders or individuals who are related by consanguinity or 19 affinity with patients or residents of hospitals or health care 20 facilities. 21 (4) Require that a private business operating within the 22 state cease the businessâs lawful operations. 23 (5) Authorize a change to established laws, policies, or 24 regulations governing a local, county, or state election for 25 public office absent prior approval of the general assembly. 26 (6) Restrict the practice of a person holding a valid 27 license to practice a health-related profession regulated 28 by a board designated pursuant to section 147.13 or by the 29 department of inspections, appeals, and licensing, or restrict 30 the scope of service delivery of a hospital, clinic, or 31 health care professional if the person or entity is otherwise 32 practicing within the scope of a valid license. 33 (7) Allow a board designated pursuant to section 147.13 to 34 restrict the prescribing authority of a licensed health-related 35 -2- LSB 6866YC (2) 91 ak/ko 2/ 8 H.F. _____ professional in a way that deters the professional from 1 prescribing medication or treatment in accordance with the 2 professionalâs best professional judgment. 3 c. Notwithstanding paragraph âbâ , the governor may recommend 4 that a private business operating within the state cease the 5 businessâs lawful operations in a measure dictated in a state 6 of disaster proclamation. 7 Sec. 3. Section 135.144, subsections 5, 6, 7, and 8, Code 8 2026, are amended to read as follows: 9 5. Order Recommend physical examinations and tests and 10 collect the collection of specimens as necessary for the 11 diagnosis or treatment of individuals, to be performed by any 12 qualified person authorized to do so by the department. An A 13 physical examination or test shall not be performed or ordered 14 recommended if the physical examination or test is reasonably 15 likely to lead to serious harm to the affected individual. The 16 affected individual has the ultimate authority to determine 17 whether to submit to the recommended physical examination 18 or testing, and shall not be subject to undue pressure or 19 compulsion to submit to the recommendation. The department may 20 isolate or quarantine , pursuant to chapter 139A and the rules 21 implementing chapter 139A and this subchapter , any infected 22 individual whose refusal of medical a physical examination or 23 testing results in uncertainty regarding whether the individual 24 has been exposed to or is infected with a communicable or 25 potentially communicable disease or otherwise poses a danger to 26 public health. The length of isolation shall not exceed the 27 longest usual incubation period for the specific communicable 28 disease. 29 6. Vaccinate or order Recommend that individuals be 30 vaccinated with a vaccine approved by the United States food 31 and drug administration as safe and effective against an 32 infectious disease and to prevent the spread of communicable 33 or potentially communicable disease. Vaccinations shall be 34 administered by any qualified person authorized to do so by the 35 -3- LSB 6866YC (2) 91 ak/ko 3/ 8 H.F. _____ department. Prior to administration of a vaccine, an adult 1 or the parent or legal representative of a minor receiving 2 the vaccine shall be provided with the federal vaccine 3 information statement for the vaccine and verbally informed 4 of the known and potential benefits and risks of the vaccine. 5 The vaccination shall not be provided or ordered recommended 6 if it is reasonably likely to lead to serious harm to the 7 affected individual. The affected individual has the ultimate 8 authority to determine whether to submit to the recommended 9 vaccination, and shall not be subject to undue pressure or 10 compulsion to submit to the recommendation. To prevent the 11 spread of communicable or potentially communicable disease, the 12 department may isolate or quarantine , pursuant to chapter 139A 13 and the rules implementing chapter 139A and this subchapter , 14 any infected person who is unable or unwilling to undergo 15 vaccination pursuant to this subsection . 16 7. Treat or order Recommend that individuals exposed to 17 or infected with disease receive treatment or prophylaxis. 18 Treatment or prophylaxis shall be administered by any qualified 19 person authorized to do so by the department. Treatment or 20 prophylaxis shall not be provided or ordered recommended if 21 the treatment or prophylaxis is reasonably likely to lead to 22 serious harm to the affected infected individual. The infected 23 individual has the ultimate authority to determine whether to 24 submit to the recommended treatment or prophylaxis, and shall 25 not be subject to undue pressure or compulsion to submit to 26 the recommendation. To prevent the spread of communicable or 27 potentially communicable disease, the department may isolate or 28 quarantine , pursuant to chapter 139A and the rules implementing 29 chapter 139A and this subchapter , any infected individual who 30 is unable or unwilling to undergo treatment or prophylaxis 31 pursuant to this section subsection . 32 8. Isolate or quarantine infected individuals or groups of 33 individuals pursuant to chapter 139A and the rules implementing 34 chapter 139A and this subchapter . 35 -4- LSB 6866YC (2) 91 ak/ko 4/ 8 H.F. _____ Sec. 4. Section 139A.4, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 1. The type and length of isolation or quarantine imposed 3 for a specific communicable disease shall be in accordance with 4 rules adopted by the department. The length of isolation or 5 quarantine shall not exceed the longest usual incubation period 6 for the specific communicable disease. 7 Sec. 5. Section 139A.8, subsection 4, paragraph a, 8 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 9 (2) The applicant, or if the applicant is a minor, the 10 applicantâs parent or legal guardian, submits an affidavit 11 signed by the applicant, or if the applicant is a minor, 12 the applicantâs parent or legal guardian, stating that the 13 immunization conflicts with the tenets and practices of a 14 recognized sincerely held religious denomination beliefs 15 of which the applicant is an adherent or member , or if the 16 applicant is a minor, of the applicantâs parent or legal 17 guardian . 18 Sec. 6. Section 139A.8, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 19 2026, is amended to read as follows: 20 b. The exemptions under this subsection do not apply in 21 times of emergency or epidemic as determined and declared by 22 the director. 23